lexc-files/prs-num/contemporative.txt
!================================
LEXICON IntrCtmp
!  person/number markers for
!     intransitive contemporative
!================================
!-----------------------|------------------------------|-----------------------|------------------------|
^[3Sg]:^ani     Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^ma           Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^pek   Enclitic; ^[4Sg]:^mini   Enclitic;
^[3Pl]:^ata     Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:^%{.m.%}mta   Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:^pesi  Enclitic; ^[4Pl]:^meggni Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^ayek    Enclitic; ^[1Du]:^%{.m.%}mtung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:^petek Enclitic; ^[4Du]:^mek    Enclitic;
^[3Du]:^agkenka Enclitic;
!-----------------------|------------------------------|-----------------------|------------------------|

!==============================
LEXICON TrnsCtmp
!  person/number markers for
!     transitive contemporative
!==============================
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.3Sg]:^agu             Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Pl]:^aki             Enclitic; ^[3Sg.3Du]:^akek             Enclitic;
^[3Pl.3Sg]:^atgu            Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Pl]:^atki            Enclitic; ^[3Pl.3Du]:^atkek            Enclitic;
^[3Du.3Sg]:^agnegu          Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Pl]:^agneki          Enclitic; ^[3Du.3Du]:^agnekek          Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.3Sg]:^%{.m.%}mkun     Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Pl]:^%{.m.%}mki      Enclitic; ^[1Sg.3Du]:^%{.m.%}mkek      Enclitic;
^[1Pl.3Sg]:^%{.m.%}mteggu   Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Pl]:^%{.m.%}mteki    Enclitic; ^[1Pl.3Du]:^%{.m.%}mtekek    Enclitic;
^[1Du.3Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegu Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegneki Enclitic; ^[1Du.3Du]:^%{.m.%}mtegnekek Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.3Sg]:^pegu            Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^peki            Enclitic; ^[2Sg.3Du]:^pekek            Enclitic;
                                      ^[2Sg.3Pl]:^peni            Enclitic;                                      | ! unclear if this is what Jacobson (2001) p.172 means
^[2Pl.3Sg]:^pesigu          Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Pl]:^pesiki          Enclitic; ^[2Pl.3Du]:^pesikek          Enclitic;
^[2Du.3Sg]:^petegnegu       Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Pl]:^petegneki       Enclitic; ^[2Du.3Du]:^petegnekek       Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.3Sg]:^minigu          Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Pl]:^miniki          Enclitic; ^[4Sg.3Du]:^minikek          Enclitic;
^[4Pl.3Sg]:^megteggu        Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Pl]:^megteki         Enclitic; ^[4Pl.3Du]:^megtekek         Enclitic;
^[4Du.3Sg]:^megnegu         Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Pl]:^megneki         Enclitic; ^[4Du.3Du]:^megnekek         Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.1Sg]:^anga            Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Pl]:^ankut           Enclitic; ^[3Sg.1Du]:^ankung           Enclitic;
^[3Pl.1Sg]:^atnga           Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Pl]:^ankut           Enclitic; ^[3Pl.1Du]:^ankung           Enclitic;
^[3Du.1Sg]:^agnenga         Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Pl]:^ankut           Enclitic; ^[3Du.1Du]:^ankung           Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
! no [1--.1--] forms                                                                                             |
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.1Sg]:^penga           Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Pl]:^pekut           Enclitic; ^[2Sg.1Du]:^pekung           Enclitic;
^[2Pl.1Sg]:^pesinga         Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Pl]:^pesikut         Enclitic; ^[2Pl.1Du]:^pesikung         Enclitic;
^[2Du.1Sg]:^petegnenga      Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Pl]:^petegnekut      Enclitic; ^[2Du.1Du]:^petegnekung      Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.1Sg]:^mininga         Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Pl]:^minikut         Enclitic; ^[4Sg.1Du]:^minikung         Enclitic;
^[4Pl.1Sg]:^megtengnga      Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Pl]:^megtekut        Enclitic; ^[4Pl.1Du]:^megtekung        Enclitic;
^[4Du.1Sg]:^megnenga        Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Pl]:^megneku         Enclitic; ^[4Du.1Du]:^megnekung        Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.2Sg]:^aten            Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Pl]:^asi             Enclitic; ^[3Sg.2Du]:^astek            Enclitic;
^[3Pl.2Sg]:^aten            Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Pl]:^asi             Enclitic; ^[3Pl.2Du]:^astek            Enclitic;
^[3Du.2Sg]:^aten            Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Pl]:^asi             Enclitic; ^[3Du.2Du]:^astek            Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.2Sg]:^%{.m.%}mken     Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Pl]:%{.m.%}^msi      Enclitic; ^[1Sg.2Du]:^%{.m.%}mtek      Enclitic;
^[1Pl.2Sg]:^%{.m.%}mken     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Pl]:%{.m.%}^msi      Enclitic; ^[1Pl.2Du]:^%{.m.%}mtek      Enclitic;
^[1Du.2Sg]:^%{.m.%}mken     Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Pl]:%{.m.%}^msi      Enclitic; ^[1Du.2Du]:^%{.m.%}mtek      Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
! no [2--.2--] forms                                                                                             |
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[4Sg.2Sg]:^miniten         Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Pl]:^minisi          Enclitic; ^[4Sg.2Du]:^minitek          Enclitic;
^[4Pl.2Sg]:^miniten         Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Pl]:^minisi          Enclitic; ^[4Pl.2Du]:^minitek          Enclitic;
^[4Du.2Sg]:^miniten         Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Pl]:^minisi          Enclitic; ^[4Du.2Du]:^minitek          Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[3Sg.4Sg]:^atni            Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Pl]:^asteng          Enclitic; ^[3Sg.4Du]:^astek            Enclitic;
^[3Pl.4Sg]:^atni            Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Pl]:^asteng          Enclitic; ^[3Pl.4Du]:^astek            Enclitic;
^[3Du.4Sg]:^atni            Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Pl]:^asteng          Enclitic; ^[3Du.4Du]:^astek            Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[1Sg.4Sg]:^%{.m.%}mni      Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Pl]:%{.m.%}^mteng    Enclitic; ^[1Sg.4Du]:^%{.m.%}mtek      Enclitic;
^[1Pl.4Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnni     Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Pl]:%{.m.%}^mteng    Enclitic; ^[1Pl.4Du]:^%{.m.%}mtek      Enclitic;
^[1Du.4Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegu Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Pl]:%{.m.%}^mtegneki Enclitic; ^[1Du.4Du]:^%{.m.%}mtegnekek Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[2Sg.4Sg]:^pegu            Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Pl]:^peki            Enclitic; ^[2Sg.4Du]:^pekek            Enclitic;
                                      ^[2Sg.4Pl]:^peni            Enclitic;                                      | ! unclear if this is what Jacobson (2001) p.172 means
^[2Pl.4Sg]:^pesigu          Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Pl]:^pesiki          Enclitic; ^[2Pl.4Du]:^pesikek          Enclitic;
^[2Du.4Sg]:^petegnegu       Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Pl]:^petegneki       Enclitic; ^[2Du.4Du]:^petegnekek       Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
! no [4--.4--] forms                                                                                             |
!-----------------------------------|-------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
! alternative forms for 4th person subject are described on Jacobson (2001) p.93
! and on p.172
